Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.090

ESD board—Members—Elections—Declarations of candidacy.

Candidates for membership on an educational service district board shall file declarations of candidacy with the Washington state school directors' association on forms prepared by the association. Declarations of candidacy may be filed no earlier than the first day of September, nor later than the 16th day of September. The association may not accept any declaration of candidacy that is not received before the 17th day of September.

[ 2023 c 83 s 1; 2022 c 79 s 7; 2006 c 263 s 606; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 16. Formerly RCW 28A.21.032.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.